dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- बद्री; बद्री; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बद्री__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ब्रिटेन; ब्रिटेन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ब्रिटेन__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कोईराला; कोईराला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कोईराला__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सगरमाथा; सगरमाथा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सगरमाथा__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिक्किम; सिक्किम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिक्किम__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- श्री; श्री; 1 -->
    <pardef n="श्री__np_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाण्डे; पाण्डे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाण्डे__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यादव; यादव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यादव__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- श्रीकृष्ण; श्रीकृष्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="श्रीकृष्ण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शेर; शेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शेर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गिरीजा; गिरीजा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गिरीजा__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेपाली; नेपाली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेपाली__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेखनाथ; लेखनाथ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लेखनाथ__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेनिन; लेनिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लेनिन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मैनाली; मैनाली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मैनाली__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हरि; हरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हरि__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रूस; रूस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रूस__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोर्वाचोभ; गोर्वाचोभ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोर्वाचोभ__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोरखापत्र; गोरखापत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोरखापत्र__np_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरिता; सरिता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरिता__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देव; देव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देव__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अशोक; अशोक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अशोक__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्जुन; अर्जुन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अर्जुन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कमल; कमल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कमल__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भैरव; भैरव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भैरव__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- द्रौपदी; द्रौपदी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="द्रौपदी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गिरी; गिरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गिरी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वनवीर; वनवीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वनवीर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गणेश; गणेश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गणेश__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दीपक; दीपक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दीपक__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुम्बिनी; लुम्बिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुम्बिनी__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिल्ली; दिल्ली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिल्ली__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राई; राई; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राई__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काठमाण्डौ; काठमाण्डौ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काठमाण्डौ__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दीपु; दीपु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दीपु__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिब्बत; तिब्बत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिब्बत__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बसन्त; बसन्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बसन्त__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="बद्री"><i>बद्री</i><par n="बद्री__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्रिटेन"><i>ब्रिटेन</i><par n="ब्रिटेन__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="कोईराला"><i>कोईराला</i><par n="कोईराला__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सगरमाथा"><i>सगरमाथा</i><par n="सगरमाथा__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="सिक्किम"><i>सिक्किम</i><par n="सिक्किम__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="श्री"><i>श्री</i><par n="श्री__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पाण्डे"><i>पाण्डे</i><par n="पाण्डे__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="यादव"><i>यादव</i><par n="यादव__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="श्रीकृष्ण"><i>श्रीकृष्ण</i><par n="श्रीकृष्ण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शेर"><i>शेर</i><par n="शेर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गिरीजा"><i>गिरीजा</i><par n="गिरीजा__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नेपाली"><i>नेपाली</i><par n="नेपाली__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="लेखनाथ"><i>लेखनाथ</i><par n="लेखनाथ__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="लेनिन"><i>लेनिन</i><par n="लेनिन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मैनाली"><i>मैनाली</i><par n="मैनाली__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="हरि"><i>हरि</i><par n="हरि__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रूस"><i>रूस</i><par n="रूस__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="गोर्वाचोभ"><i>गोर्वाचोभ</i><par n="गोर्वाचोभ__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गोरखापत्र"><i>गोरखापत्र</i><par n="गोरखापत्र__np_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सरिता"><i>सरिता</i><par n="सरिता__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="देव"><i>देव</i><par n="देव__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="अशोक"><i>अशोक</i><par n="अशोक__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्जुन"><i>अर्जुन</i><par n="अर्जुन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कमल"><i>कमल</i><par n="कमल__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भैरव"><i>भैरव</i><par n="भैरव__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="द्रौपदी"><i>द्रौपदी</i><par n="द्रौपदी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गिरी"><i>गिरी</i><par n="गिरी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="वनवीर"><i>वनवीर</i><par n="वनवीर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गणेश"><i>गणेश</i><par n="गणेश__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दीपक"><i>दीपक</i><par n="दीपक__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="लुम्बिनी"><i>लुम्बिनी</i><par n="लुम्बिनी__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="दिल्ली"><i>दिल्ली</i><par n="दिल्ली__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="राई"><i>राई</i><par n="राई__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="काठमाण्डौ"><i>काठमाण्डौ</i><par n="काठमाण्डौ__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="दीपु"><i>दीपु</i><par n="दीपु__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="तिब्बत"><i>तिब्बत</i><par n="तिब्बत__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="बसन्त"><i>बसन्त</i><par n="बसन्त__np_m_aa"/></e>
